nb: Strømtype for setejustering: Elektrisk og manuell (blandet); Elektrisk; Manuell; Annet
sl-SI: Vrsta pogona za nastavljanje sedeža: Električno in ročno (mešano); Električno; Ročno; Drugo
ro-RO: Tip de acționare pentru reglarea scaunului auto: Electric + manual (mixt); Electric; Manual; Altele
zh-TW: 座椅調整動力類型: 電動 + 手動 (混合); 電動; 手動; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta električnog podešavanja sjedala: Električno + ručno (mješovito); Električno; Ručno; Ostalo
pt-BR: Banco tipo de acionamento do ajuste: Elétrico e manual (misto); Acionamento elétrico; Manual; Outros
hu: Ülésállítás működtetési típusa: Elektromos + kézi (vegyes); Elektromos; Kézi; Egyéb
ko: 시트 조절 동력 유형: 전동 + 수동(혼합형); 전동식; 수동식; 기타
el: Ηλεκτρική ρύθμιση καθίσματος: Ηλεκτρικό + χειροκίνητο (μικτό); Ηλεκτρικό; Χειροκίνητο; Άλλο
ru: Тип привода регулировки сиденья: Электрическая + ручная (смешанная); Электропривод; Ручная; Другое
fr: Type de réglage électrique du siège: Électrique + manuel (mixte); Électrique; Manuel; Autre
cs: Typ elektrického nastavení sedadla: Elektrické + manuální (smíšené); Elektrické; Manuální; Jiné
sv: Typ av sätesjusteringskraft: Elektrisk + manuell (blandad); Elektrisk; Manuell; Övrigt
fi: Istuimen säätötapa: Sähköinen ja manuaalinen (yhdistelmä); Sähkötoiminen; Manuaalinen; Muu
da: Sædejusterings strømtype: Elektrisk og manuel (blandet); Elektrisk; Manuel; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de ajuste elétrico do assento: Elétrico + manual (misto); Elétrico; Manual; Outro
nl: Stoelverstelling voedingstype: Elektrisch en handmatig (gemengd); Elektrisch; Handmatig; Overig
th: ประเภทการปรับเบาะนั่งด้วยระบบไฟฟ้า: ไฟฟ้า + แมนนวล (ผสม); พลังงานไฟฟ้า; แมนนวล; อื่นๆ
en: Seat adjustment power type: Electric + manual (mixed); Electric power; Manual; Other
ja: シート調整電動タイプ: 電動 + 手動 (混合); 電動; 手動; その他
sk-SK: Typ napájania elektrického nastavenia sedadla: Elektrické a manuálne (zmiešané); Elektrické; Manuálne; Iné
de: Antriebsart der Sitzverstellung: Elektrisch + manuell (gemischt); Elektrisch; Manuell; Sonstige
bg-BG: Тип задвижване на регулирането на седалката: Електрическо + ръчно (смесено); Електрическо; Ръчно; Други
pl: Typ regulacji fotela: Elektryczna + ręczna (mieszana); Elektryczna; Ręczna; Inna
lt-LT: Sėdynės reguliavimo pavaros tipas: Elektrinis + mechaninis (mišrus); Elektrinis; Mechaninis; Kita
vi: Loại điều chỉnh ghế bằng điện: Chỉnh điện + cơ (hỗn hợp); Chỉnh điện; Chỉnh cơ; Khác
zh-CN: 座椅调节动力类型: 电动 + 手动（混合）; 电动; 手动; 其他
tr: Koltuk ayar güç tipi: Elektrikli ve manuel (karma); Elektrikli; Manuel; Diğer
es: Tipo eléctrico de ajuste del asiento: Eléctrico + manual (mixto); Eléctrico; Manual; Otro
it: Tipo di regolazione elettrica del sedile: Elettrico + manuale (misto); Comando elettrico; Manuale; Altro